Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1566
Act; termination; extension; considerations.

The Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act shall terminate on September 30, 2030, unless extended by the Legislature. In order to determine whether such extension shall occur, the department shall review and evaluate the extent to which the purposes of the act have been and are being achieved and the need for continuation of the program and requirements established by the act. Such review and evaluation shall be completed at least six months prior to the date established by this section for termination of the act.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 33;

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 24;

Laws 1985, LB 127, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 93;

Laws 2001, LB 337, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 33, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB798, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB844, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB858, § 20;

Laws 2025, LB167, § 1.
September 30, 2030